src/fst/affixes/adjectives.lexc
!Masculine adjectives
!====================

!regular forms

LEXICON RYCHLY 
+A: GRAD ;

LEXICON GRAD 
@D.Sup.ON@ NOSUP ;
@R.Sup.ON@ SUP ;

LEXICON NOSUP
+Pos:    CASENUM ;
+Cmp:est CASENUM ;

LEXICON SUP
Sup:est CASENUM ;


LEXICON CASENUM
a-m ;
a-f ;

LEXICON a-m
+Msc+Sg+Nom:y # ;

LEXICON a-f
+Fem+Sg+Nom:a # ;
