src/fst/stems/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON Adjective
 SUPPREF ; !superlative
 ADJLEX ; 

! Prefixes

LEXICON SUPPREF !superlative
@P.Sup.ON@:nej@P.Sup.ON@ ADJLEX ;
@P.Sup.ON@:nej@P.Sup.ON@ NEGPREF ;

LEXICON NEGPREF
Neg+:ne NEGADJ ;
!        oNEGADJ ;

LEXICON NEGADJ
!mely:mel NEMELY ;
  ADJLEX ; !positive roots
! NEGADJLEX ; !roots with negation

! The adjectives themselves

LEXICON ADJLEX
rychly:rychl RYCHLY ;
! and 4000 more or so...



!LEXICON NEGADJLEX
!# ;


!LEXICON NEMELY
!# ;
